Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-107
Game and Parks Commission; secretary; duties; deposit of receipts from administration of game and fish laws; credited to State Game Fund.

It shall be the duty of the secretary to keep an exact and detailed account and record of the activities of the Game and Parks Commission, and on September 15 of each year, he or she shall submit to the Governor a report of all expenditures made during the preceding fiscal year, vouchers for which shall be kept on file in the office of the secretary and open to the inspection of the Governor, Auditor of Public Accounts, and members of the Legislature. All money received by the commission from the administration of fish and game shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Game Fund except as otherwise provided in the Game Law.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 9, p. 446;

C.S.1929, § 81-6509;

R.S.1943, § 81-808;

Laws 1961, c. 427, § 1, p. 1335;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-808;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 7.